Hawaii statutes.
§202-2 Duties of council. In
accordance with P.L. 113-128 (29 U.S.C. 3111), the workforce development
council shall assist the governor in:

(1) The development, implementation, and modification
of the state plan consistent with P.L. 113-128 (29 U.S.C. 3112);

(2) The review of statewide policies, statewide
programs, and recommendations on actions that should be taken by the State to
align workforce development programs in a manner that supports a comprehensive
and streamlined workforce development system in the State, including
consideration of programs and activities of one-stop partners that are not core
programs;

(3) The development and continuous improvement of the
workforce development system in the State;

(4) The development and updating of comprehensive
state performance accountability measures, including state adjusted levels of
performance, to assess the effectiveness of the core programs in the State as
required under P.L. 113-128 (29 U.S.C. 3141(b));

(5) The identification and dissemination of
information on best practices for the effective operation of one-stop centers,
and the development of effective local boards and effective training programs;

(6) The development and review of statewide policies
affecting the coordinated provision of services through the State's one-stop
delivery system;

(7) The development of strategies for technological
improvements to facilitate access to, and improve the quality of, services and
activities provided through the one-stop delivery system;

(8) The development of strategies for aligning
technology and data systems across one-stop partner programs to enhance service
delivery and improve efficiencies in reporting on performance accountability
measures, including the design and implementation of common intake, data
collection, case management information, and performance accountability
measurement and reporting processes, and the incorporation of local input into
such design and implementation, to improve coordination of services across
one-stop partner programs;

(9) The development of allocation formulas for the
distribution of funds for employment and training activities for adults, and
youth workforce investment activities, to local areas as permitted under P.L.
113-128 (29 U.S.C. 3163(b)(3), 3173(b)(3));

(10) The preparation of annual reports as described in
P.L. 113-128 (29 U.S.C. 3141(d));

(11) The development of the statewide workforce and
labor market information system described in the Wagner-Peyser Act (29 U.S.C.
49l-2(e));

(12) The development of such other policies as may
promote statewide objectives for, and enhance the performance of, the workforce
development system;

(13) Creating public awareness and understanding of
the State's workforce development plans, policies, programs, and activities,
and promoting the plans, policies, programs, and activities as economic
investments;

(14) Submitting annual reports of the council's
activities and recommendations to the governor and the legislature, and posting
the annual reports electronically on the council's website no later than twenty
days before the convening of each regular session. Annual reports shall
include:

(A) The status of the comprehensive state
plan for workforce development; and

(B) Information regarding the workforce
development programs offered throughout the State, the number of individuals
placed in high-demand or high-growth employment through workforce development
programs by departments, the type or category of employment garnered, and
allocations of state, federal, and other funding to achieve placements into
higher-skilled jobs;

(15) Evaluating the state workforce development plan
in terms of how its purposes, goals, and objectives have been carried out
throughout the State;

(16) Providing technical assistance to local workforce
development boards and other similar organizations;

(17) Carrying out required functions and duties
related to workforce development of any advisory body required or made optional
by federal legislation;

(18) The review and certification of local workforce
boards and plans prepared by local workforce boards for the use of federal
workforce development funds as provided in P.L. 113-128 (29 U.S.C.
3122(b)-(c)); and

(19) Commenting on the measures taken pursuant to
section 122(c)(17) of the Carl D. Perkins Career and Technical Education Act of
2006, P.L. 109-270. [L 1965, c 270, §3; Supp, §98W-3; HRS §202-2; am L 1970, c
170, §2; am L 1985, c 252, §3; am L 1988, c 38, §1; am L 1997, c 346, §3; am L
1999, c 72, §4; am L 2000, c 58, §1; am L 2003, c 148, §4; am L 2016, c 57, §3]

Cross References

Due date of annual report, see §93-12.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next